it: Unità di purezza: 0,999); 999); Purezza (es.; Carati (K); Parti per mille (es.; Percentuale (%); Altro
ru: Единица чистоты: 0,999); 999); Проба (например,; Карат (К); Промилле (например,; Процент (%); Другое
fi: Puhtausyksikkö: 0,999); 999); Pitoisuus (esim.; Karaatti (K); Promille (esim.; Prosentti (%); Muu
th: หน่วยความบริสุทธิ์: 0.999); 999); ความบริสุทธิ์ (เช่น; กะรัต (K); ในพันส่วน (เช่น; เปอร์เซ็นต์ (%); อื่นๆ
sv: Enhet för renhet: 0,999); 999); Finhet (t.ex.; Karat (K); Promille (t.ex.; Procent (%); Övrigt
el: Μονάδα καθαρότητας: 0,999); 999); Καθαρότητα (π.χ.; Καράτια (K); Μέρη ανά χιλιοστό (π.χ.; Ποσοστό (%); Άλλο
sl-SI: Enota za čistost: 0,999); 999); Čistost (npr.; Karat (K); Tisočine (npr.; Odstotek (%); Drugo
pt-PT: Unidade de pureza: 0,999); 999); Finura (ex.; Quilates (K); Partes por mil (ex.; Percentagem (%); Outra
nb: Renhetsenhet: 0,999); 999); Finhet (f.eks.; Karat (K); Promille (f.eks.; Prosent (%); Annet
lt-LT: Grynumo vienetas: 0,999); 999); Praba (pvz.,; Karatas (K); Tūkstantosios dalys (pvz.,; Procentai (%); Kita
vi: Đơn vị độ tinh khiết: 0.999); 999); Độ tinh khiết (VD:; Karat (K); Phần nghìn (VD:; Phần trăm (%); Khác
ro-RO: Unitate de puritate: 0,999); 999); Finețe (ex.; Carat (K); Părți la mie (ex.; Procent (%); Altele
tr: Saflık birimi: 0.999); 999); Saflık derecesi (örn.; Karat (K); Binde bir oranı (örn.; Yüzde (%); Diğer
bg-BG: Единица за чистота: 0,999); 999); Чистота (напр.; Карат (K); Части на хиляда (напр.; Процент (%); Друго
fr: Unité de pureté: 0,999); 999); Titre (p. ex.; Carat (K); Millièmes (p. ex.; Pourcentage (%); Autre
de: Einheit des Reinheitsgrads: 0,999); 999); Feingehalt (z. B.; Karat (K); Promille (z. B.; Prozent (%); Sonstige
zh-TW: 純度單位: 0.999); 999); 成色 (例如：; 開 (K); 千分比 (例如：; 百分比 (%); 其他
ko: 순도 단위: 0.999); 999); 순도(예:; 캐럿(K); 퍼밀(예:; 퍼센트(%); 기타
pt-BR: Pureza unidade: 0,999); 999); Finura (ex.; Quilate (K); Partes por mil (ex.; Porcentagem (%); Outro
hu: Tisztasági egység: 0.999); 999); Finomság (pl.; Karát (K); Ezrelék (pl.; Százalék (%); Egyéb
en: Purity unit: 0.999); 999); Fineness (e.g.; Karat (K); Parts per thousand (e.g.; Percent (%); Other
sk-SK: Jednotka čistoty: 0.999); 999); Rýdzosť (napr.; Karát (K); Promile (napr.; Percentá (%); Iné
es: Unidad de pureza: 0,999); 999); Pureza (ej.; Quilates (K); Partes por mil (ej.; Porcentaje (%); Otra
pl: Jednostka czystości: 0,999); 999); Próba (np.; Karat (K); Części na tysiąc (np.; Procent (%); Inne
zh-CN: 纯度单位: 0.999）; 999）; 纯度（例如; 开（K）; 千分率（例如; 百分比（%）; 其他
hr-HR: Jedinica čistoće: 0,999); 999); Finoća (npr.; Karat (K); Tisućiti dijelovi (npr.; Postotak (%); Ostalo
cs: Jednotka čistoty: 0,999); 999); Ryzost (např.; Karát (K); Promile (např.; Procenta (%); Jiné
nl: Zuiverheidseenheid: 0,999); 999); Fijnheid (bijv.; Karaat (K); Promille (bijv.; Procent (%); Overig
da: Renhedsenhed: 0.999); 999); Lødighed (f.eks.; Karat (K); Promille (f.eks.; Procent (%); Andet
ja: 純度単位: 0.999); 999); 純度 (例:; カラット (K); 千分率 (例:; パーセント (%); その他